public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A eralidar aralidaresi/P đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaresiu/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarion/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarioni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarionse đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarisen/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidariseni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarisense đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarision/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarisioni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarisionse đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarisié/P đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarisiéu/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarison/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarisoni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarisonse đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarié/P đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidariéu/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarme/G đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaron/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaroni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaronse đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarà/JLNR đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaràe/R đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarè/JL đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarèmi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaré/P đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarémoi/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarésimo/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarésimoi/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaréu/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaría/JLNR đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaríami/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaríatu/O đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaríe/JLR đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaríelo/S đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaríemi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidarò/JL đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaròmi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidase/I đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidasi đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidasta/I đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidaste/I đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidasti/I đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidasto/I đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidava/JLPR đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidave/JL đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidavi/NP đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidavo/JL đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralide/IJLR đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidede đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidege đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidemo/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar araliden/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidendo/E đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidene đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralideni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidense đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidese/I đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidesi đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidesta/I đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralideste/I đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidesti/I đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidesto/I đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralideva/JLPR đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralideve/JL đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidevi/NP đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidevo/JL đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidi/N đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidion/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidione đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidioni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidionse đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisen/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisene đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidiseni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisense đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidision/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisione đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisioni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisionse đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisié/P đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisiéde/P đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisiége/P đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidison/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisone đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisoni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidisonse đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidiven/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidiveni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidivense đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidivion/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidivioni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidivionse đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidivié/P đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidiviéu/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidivon/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidivoni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidivonse đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidié/P đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidiéde/P đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidiége/P đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidiéu/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralido/JL đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidon/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidone đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidoni/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidonse đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidà đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàa/JLPR đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàami/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàau/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàe/JL đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàelo/S đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàemi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidài/NP đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàimo/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàimoi/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàitu/O đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàndome/G đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàndomene/G đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidào/JL đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàomi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàrmene/G đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàsimo đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàvami/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàvau/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàvelo/S đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàvemi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàvimo/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàvimoi/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàvitu/O đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidàvomi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidè/FP đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidème/H đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidèu/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidé/FP đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéa/JLPR đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéami/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéau/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidée/JL đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéelo/S đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéemi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéi/NP đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéimo/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéimoi/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéitu/O đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidémoi/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéndome/G đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéndomene/G đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéo/JL đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéomi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidésimo đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidéu/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidévami/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidévau/Q đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidévelo/S đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidévemi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidévimo/L đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidévimoi/M đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidévitu/O đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralidévomi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralídelo/S đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralídeme/H đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralídemi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralíditu/O đeneralidar
SFX A eralidar aralídomi/K đeneralidar
SFX A eralixar aralixa/FR đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixada đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixade đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixadi đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixado đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixando/E đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixante đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixar/E đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixaralo/S đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarami/K đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixaratu/O đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarave/RT đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixare đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixaremo/L đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixaren/L đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixareni/M đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarense đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixaresi/P đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixaresiu/Q đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarion/L đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarioni/M đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarionse đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarisen/L đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixariseni/M đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarisense đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarision/L đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarisioni/M đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarisionse đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarisié/P đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarisiéu/Q đeneralixar
SFX A eralixar aralixarison/L đeneralixar
