public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec2.dic
alar/A
realdir/A
inalsar/A
andar/A
ankorar/A
arderar/A
armiđar/A
arxarar/A
aŧelerar/A
aumentar/A
axevolar/A
dexbaferar/A
baɉar/A
dexbalar/A
balbetar/A
inbalonar/A
rabaltar/A
inbanboƚar/A
banpar/A
inbaraŧar/A
bardar/A
barxeletar/A
bateđar/A
xbatocar/A
inbauƚar/A
baxnar/A
bekoƚar/A
xberlumar/A
inbéver/A
xbiankir/A
bibiar/A
bindar/A
birbantar/A
xbixegar/A
bójer/A
abokar/A
boƚar/A
xbolsar/A
rebondolar/A
bordelar/A
bortir/A
botidar/A
dexbosolar/A
xbraitar/A
bramiđar/A
xbrasar/A
xbrenar/A
brinkar/A
xbrojar/A
xbronkolar/A
bruskiar/A
xbufar/A
inbusolotar/A
inbuxerar/A
descapar/A
incavar/A
inkoncèñer/A
océñer/A
scikarar/A
scokidar/A
maƚedir/A
davañar/A
deñar/A
dexeñar/A
distribuir/A
dokumentar/A
adoƚorar/A
domisiliar/A
indorar/A
xdotoredar/A
indrisar/A
tradúxer/A
indaltronar/A
inđenerar/A
dogolar/A
kondónxer/A
đornaliđar/A
đugatolar/A
sperđurar/A
eklisar/A
emular/A
riéser/A
axaƚar/A
far/A
fabregar/A
infaldar/A
falŧidiar/A
fanfuñar/A
infasar/A
infasendar/A
scarifegar/A
senplifegar/A
fénder/A
proferir/A
festixar/A
desfiamar/A
desfibiar/A
rafigurar/A
trafiƚar/A
fínxer/A
sfiorixar/A
infistegar/A
foderar/A
desfojar/A
fónder/A
formar/A
informigolar/A
sforsar/A
frajar/A
infrànxer/A
fraskexar/A
fraŧionar/A
frenar/A
sfritegar/A
sfroxar/A
sentrifugar/A
funŧionar/A
refúxer/A
galanteɉar/A
ingaƚetar/A
inganar/A
xgañoƚar/A
garbidar/A
xgarofoƚar/A
xgaxolar/A
gloriar/A
xgonbrar/A
xgorgonar/A
xgrameñar/A
dexgraneƚar/A
gratar/A
ingravar/A
ingremir/A
dexgresiar/A
ingriñolir/A
grixolir/A
dexgrosar/A
xguansar/A
guarnir/A
ingurar/A
idroxenar/A
reinestar/A
inpaxar/A
insular/A
intrivelar/A
iterar/A
xɉansar/A
xjasar/A
jelomarar/A
xjinŧar/A
dexjoŧar/A
xjosolar/A
kabalar/A
inkaenar/A
inkajar/A
kalivar/A
inkalmar/A
rekalsar/A
kamufar/A
skaneƚar/A
inkankrenar/A
kantarar/A
kaparar/A
kaponar/A
karamelar/A
inkargar/A
deskaroñar/A
skartedar/A
skasir/A
katarar/A
inkatigar/A
prekaŧar/A
skavar/A
skavesar/A
esklúder/A
arkòɉer/A
kokoƚar/A
inkolegar/A
skolpar/A
eskomiar/A
konfetar/A
skonpañar/A
kontedar/A
konsar/A
skopelotar/A
deskoraɉir/A
inkòrder/A
skornar/A
korsidar/A
kostumar/A
kovar/A
rekòxer/A
rinkréser/A
kritegar/A
skrostar/A
inkroxar/A
kuaɉar/A
kuèrder/A
skuinternar/A
kulatar/A
prokurar/A
inkusoƚar/A
lanbikar/A
lanpixar/A
lapiar/A
straƚasar/A
ƚaudar/A
inledamar/A
reƚegar/A
leñar/A
aƚevar/A
lexitimar/A
reƚievar/A
delimar/A
deƚirar/A
livelar/A
xloɉar/A
straƚosar/A
prelúder/A
ƚusar/A
xluxegar/A
xmagrar/A
xmaƚisiar/A
dexmanegar/A
maniđar/A
mañetiđar/A
marejar/A
martiriđar/A
maselar/A	po:verb po:noun
matar/A
masar/A
maxarir/A
framexar/A
xmegolar/A
menasar/A
meraveɉar/A
mestierar/A
prométer/A
miɉorar/A
xminusar/A
inmobijar/A
xmokajar/A
mòlxer/A
mónder/A
inmorar/A
morbinar/A
inmortalar/A
mosar/A
dexmunegar/A
xnanarar/A
xnegridar/A
noledar/A
nuvolir/A
ocixar/A
onbridar/A
ordir/A
osixenar/A
padronidar/A
paletar/A
inpaltanar/A
paonidar/A
desparexar/A
inpasir/A
patar/A
spavejar/A
inpelar/A
spenelar/A
dispensar/A
perpetuar/A
petolar/A
piadexar/A
pieđar/A
piolar/A
pistoredar/A
konplegar/A
polveridar/A
sponcar/A
spónxer/A
konpostar/A
intraprénder/A
prinsipiar/A
despulexar/A
spusolir/A
rancinar/A
ratinar/A
regalar/A
rexekar/A
irisolar/A
irokar/A
ropetar/A
inrudenir/A
sabionar/A
saƚariar/A
desanguar/A
scafiđar/A
insekir/A
seitar/A
insemoƚar/A
serar/A
sialar/A
sinkopar/A
skandaɉar/A
skarsixar/A
skoar/A
iskríver/A
soƚaɉar/A
insonar/A
sovenŧionar/A
ispear/A
spigaŧar/A
insporkar/A
kontrastaɉar/A
stasionar/A
stirpar/A
instornir/A
konstrénder/A
strupiar/A
sufitar/A
insutiƚir/A
taketar/A
intardegar/A
tavanexar/A
sorinténder/A
tenutar/A
apartéñer/A
testar/A
intitoƚar/A
toneđar/A
stornar/A
tostar/A
stranbaƚar/A
tratixar/A
tribolar/A
troneđar/A
stusegar/A
ŧavarjar/A
ŧenjar/A
reŧerkar/A
ŧianŧar/A
simolar/A
sitar/A
insotar/A
urteđar/A
sprevaƚer/A
varentar/A
vejetar/A
ventidar/A
konvèñer/A
vergoƚar/A
pervertir/A
dexvidar/A
vitaliđar/A
invoɉar/A
‘oltar/A
traxaƚir/A
xelar/A
xɉaventar/A
rexòlver/A
infenir/A
benedíxer/A
karateriđar/A
botar/A
injaŧar/A
paƚexar/A
skaroñar/A
xmiaoƚar/A
eƚíder/A
korbetar/A
spiantar/A
